Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3512.02
Licensure, defined.

Licensure means a certificate of licensure issued by the board showing that an individual has met the licensing requirements to be a professional geologist under the Geologists Regulation Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-3517;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 12.